Utah statutes.
58-39a-6.   Grounds for denial of certificate -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for refusal to issue a certificate to an applicant, for refusal to renew the  certificate of a certified ADR provider, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the certificate of a certified ADR provider, to issue a public or private reprimand to a certified ADR provider, and to issue cease and desist orders shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.

